Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
38-164

Boards; professional members; qualifications.

(1) A professional member of a board appointed under the Uniform Licensing Law
prior to December 1, 2008, shall remain subject to the requirements of the
original appointment until reappointed under the Uniform Credentialing Act.
Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act, every
professional member of a board appointed on or after December 1, 2008, shall
have held and maintained an active credential and be and have been actively
engaged in the practice of his or her profession for a period of five years just
preceding his or her appointment and shall maintain such credential and practice
while serving as a board member. For purposes of this section, active practice
means devoting a substantial portion of time to rendering professional services.

(2) Each professional member of a board shall have been a resident of Nebraska
for one year and shall remain a resident of Nebraska while serving as a board
member.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 14, p. 458;

C.S.1929, § 71-304;

Laws 1935, c. 142, § 31, p. 530;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-304;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 6, p. 540;

R.S.1943, § 71-114;

Laws 1957, c. 298, § 9, p. 1078;

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 11;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 9;

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 18;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 16;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 18;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 109;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-114;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 64.